Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 1
JOINT LEGISLATIVE OVERSIGHT COMMITTEES

2-7-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

A multiplicity of powers, duties, and functions have been assigned to the executive branch of state government in accordance with law and have been undertaken by the executive branch on its own initiative or at the behest of the federal government;

Considerations such as avoidance of duplication, cost-effective service delivery, and efficient management of state government may have been overlooked in the assignment and undertaking of said powers, duties, and functions;

While the initial assignment or undertaking of powers, duties, and functions may be reasonable, the assignment or undertaking may become obsolete because of changes in the nature of the problem sought to be solved or because of the passage of time;

The interests of cost-effective and expedited delivery of services, avoidance of excessive tax burdens, and better government would be served by regular analytical review of the powers, duties, and functions of executive agencies by the general assembly for the purpose of determining whether there is a public need for continued existence of such powers, duties, and functions and whether the public need would be better served by the elimination, reassignment, or expansion of said powers, duties, and functions.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 307, § 1, effective June 15.

2-7-102. Assignment of departments for review - all principal departments subject to legislative oversight - composition of joint legislative oversight committees.

Beginning in 1980, a general assembly during its second regular session shall designate at least three principal departments for study by joint legislative oversight committees during the interim following the first regular session of the next general assembly. Each of the twenty principal departments shall be studied in this manner at least once before January 1, 1994. A joint legislative oversight committee may be assigned more than one principal department during each interim period.

The legislative audit committee shall cause to be conducted a performance audit of each principal department designated by a general assembly during its second regular session for legislative oversight which audit shall be completed on or before the adjournment of the first regular session of the next general assembly. In conducting the audit, the legislative audit committee shall take into consideration, but not be limited to considering, the factors listed in section 2-7-103 (1). An audit of a principal department shall be forwarded to the joint legislative oversight committee which is to study said principal department.

During the first regular session of the next general assembly, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall designate the appropriate joint committee of reference as the joint legislative oversight committee for a particular principal department and shall appoint the members of the joint legislative committee from among the members of the committee of reference in each house.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 308, § 1, effective June 15.

2-7-103. Review of principal department - subject matter to be studied.

A joint legislative oversight committee shall study a principal department's powers, duties, and functions in order to evaluate the public need for continuance of said powers, duties, and functions and whether the public need would be better served by the elimination, reassignment, or expansion of said powers, duties, and functions.

Said study may include, but not be limited to:

Identification of unnecessary duplication of functions, situations in which similar functions should be consolidated in one division or in which divisions should be consolidated, and situations in which efficient administration would be served by transferring existing powers, duties, and functions among principal departments or elimination of said powers, duties, and functions;

Examination of the extent to which the proper exercise of powers and performance of duties and functions has been impeded or enhanced by existing statutes and procedures and practices of the principal department, and any other circumstances, including budgeting, resources, and personnel matters;

Study of the efficiency and cooperation exhibited by the principal department in processing inquiries and complaints from the public;

The extent to which changes are necessary in the enabling laws of the principal department.

Beginning in 1981, said study shall include a review of all fees and fines charged by the principal department. Pursuant to such review, the principal department shall be required to tabulate all fees and fines and the amounts thereof, state the purpose of each, and state the rationale for each where appropriate.

A joint legislative oversight committee may require a principal department to make budget presentations which clearly illustrate the source, amount, and expenditure of funds in relation to each of the principal department's powers, duties, and functions.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 308, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 81:

(1)(c) added, p. 351, § 1, effective June 4.

2-7-104. Staff - report - recommendations.

In addition to the audit reports provided for in section 2-7-102 (2), a joint legislative oversight committee shall receive staff services and information from the legislative council staff and the joint budget committee staff and may request assistance from the office of state planning and budgeting. Drafting services and legal research shall be provided by the office of legislative legal services.

A joint legislative oversight committee shall report on its study of a principal department to the general assembly following completion of the study. Said report shall contain the committee's findings and recommendations.

Legislative oversight pursuant to this article shall be in addition to any other periodic review for the purpose of determining whether an agency should be terminated or renewed.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 309, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 969, § 19, effective July 1, 1984.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 309, § 15, effective May 23.